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DTC P0715/67 Input/Turbine Speed Sensor Circuit Malfunc-
tion (O/D Direct Clutch Speed Sensor)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This sensor detects the rotation speed of the O/D input shaft
from the rotation of the O/D direct clutch drum.
Its construction is the same as that of the No.2 speed sensor
(See page DI−44).
By comparing the O/D direct clutch speed signal and No.2
speed sensor signal, the Engine and ECT ECU detects the shift
timingof thegearsandappropriatelycontrols theengine torque
andhydraulicpressure in response tovariousconditions, thus
doingsmoothgearshift.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P0715/67

All conditions below are detected for 5 secs. or more
(2−tripdetection logic)
(a) Gear change not being performed
(b) Gear position: 1st, 2nd 3rd or O/D
(c)T/M inputshaft rpm:300rpmor less
(d) T/M output shaft rpm: 1,000 rpm or more
(e) Neutral start switch: OFF
(f) No.1, No.2 solenoid valves and vehicle speed sensor are in
normal operation

SOpenorshort inO/Ddirectclutchspeedsensorcircuit
SO/Ddirectclutchspeedsensor
SEngineandECTECU
SAutomatic transmissionassembly

Refer to thechart for thewave formbetween terminalsNCO
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andNCO
−

duringengine idling.
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WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
In case of using the hand−held tester, start the inspection from step 1 and in case of not using the hand−held
tester, start from step 2.

1 Using hand−held tester, check O/D direct clutch speed signal.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the DLC3 cover.
(b) Connect a hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(c) Start the engine (Shift range: P).
(d) Turn the hand−held tester main switch ON.
CHECK:
Read O/D direct clutch speed at engine idling.
OK:

750 ±  50 rpm at engine idling

NG Go to step 2.

OK

Proceed to next circuit inspection shown in problem symptoms table (See page DI−22). However,
when DTC P0715/67 is displayed, check and replace Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−35).
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2 Check resistance between terminals NCO
+ 

and NCO
− of Engine and ECT ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door

(See page BO−127).
(b) Disconnect the connector from Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Check resistance between terminals NCO

+ 
and NCO

− of En-
gine and ECT ECU
OK:

Resistance: 560 − 680 � at 20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F)

OK Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
(See page IN−35).

OK

3 Check O/D direct clutch speed sensor.

PREPARATION:
Remove the O/D direct clutch speed sensor from the transmis-
sion.
CHECK:
(a) Measure resistance between terminals 1 and 2 of O/D di-

rect clutch speed sensor.
(b) Check voltage between terminals 1 and 2 of the speed

sensor when a magnet is put close to the front end of the
speed sensor then kept away quickly.

OK:
(a): Voltage is generated intermittently
(b): Resistance: 560 − 680 � 20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F)

HINT:
The generated voltage is extremely low.

NG Replace the O/D direct clutch speed sensor.

OK

Check and repair harness and connector be-
tween Engine and ECT ECU and O/D direct
clutch speed sensor (See page IN−35).


